Utah statutes.
16-10a-702.   Special meeting.
(1)  A corporation shall hold a special meeting of shareholders:
(a)  on call of its board of directors or the person or persons authorized by
the bylaws to call a special meeting; or
(b)  if the holders of shares representing at least 10% of all the votes
entitled to be cast on any issue proposed to be considered at the proposed
special meeting sign, date, and deliver to the corporation's secretary one or
more written demands for the meeting, stating the purpose or purposes for
which it is to be held.
(2)  If not otherwise fixed under Sections 16-10a-703 or 16-10a-707, the
record date for determining shareholders entitled to demand a special meeting
pursuant to Subsection (1)(b) is the earliest date of any of the demands
pursuant to which the meeting is called or the date that is 60 days prior to
the date the first of the written demands pursuant to which the meeting is
called is received by the corporation, whichever is later.
(3)  Special shareholders' meetings may be held in or out of this state at the
place stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws.  If no place is stated
or fixed in accordance with the bylaws, special meetings shall be held at the
corporation's principal office.
(4)  Only business within the purpose or purposes described in the meeting
notice required by Subsection 16-10a-705(3) may be conducted at a special
shareholders' meeting, unless notice of the meeting is waived by all
shareholders pursuant to Section 16-10a-706.
